Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8178.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-18.1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-18.1 entitled
"Transportation Investment and Debt Reduction Act of 2011" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-18.1-5. Allocation of funds.
(a) The monies in the highway maintenance fund to be directed to the department of
transportation pursuant to § 39-18.1-4(b)(1) — (b)(3) shall be allocated through the transportation
improvement program process to provide the state match for federal transportation funds, in place
of borrowing, as approved by the state planning council. The expenditure of moneys in the highway
maintenance fund shall only be authorized for projects that appear in the state’s transportation
improvement program.
(b) Provided, however, that beginning with fiscal year 2015 and annually thereafter, the
department of transportation will allocate necessary funding to programs that are designed to
eliminate structural deficiencies of the state’s bridge, road, and maintenance systems and
infrastructure.
(c) Provided, that beginning July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2025, five percent (5%) of
available proceeds in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually
to the Rhode Island public transit authority for operating expenditures.
(d) Provided, that beginning July 1, 2025, ten percent (10%) of available proceeds in the
Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually to the Rhode Island public

transit authority for operating expenditures.
(e) Provided, that beginning July 1, 2026, twenty percent (20%) of available proceeds in
the Rhode Island highway maintenance account shall be allocated annually to the Rhode Island
public transit authority for operating expenditures.
(e)(f) Provided, further, that from July 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, in addition to the
amount above, the Rhode Island public transit authority shall receive an amount of not less than
five million dollars ($5,000,000) each fiscal year, except for the period July 1, 2019, through June
30, 2022, during which such amount or a portion thereof may come from federal coronavirus relief
funds.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005429
========
LC005429 - Page 2 of 3